Wyoming statutes. Title 31 Motor Vehicles
Article 1. In General
§ 31-7-115.
Issuance, description and contents.

Upon the satisfactory completion of any required examination, the division shall issue to every qualifying applicant a driver’s license, and:

The license shall be tamperproof to the maximum extent practicable and may include security features as deemed appropriate by the department;

The commercial driver’s license and commercial learner’s permit shall be marked “Commercial Driver’s License” or “CDL”;

The driver’s license shall include, but not be limited to, the following information:

The class or type of motor vehicle or vehicles which the person is authorized to drive together with any authorized endorsements or required restrictions;

The distinguishing number assigned to the licensee;

The full legal name, any identifying numbers or letters deemed appropriate, date of birth, principal residence address, height, weight and sex of the licensee. Unless otherwise required by federal law, the social security number of the person shall not be required on a driver’s license;

A full facial digital color photograph of the licensee;

The space for identification as an anatomical organ donor as provided for in W.S.

31-7-139

;

The licensee’s usual signature. No license is valid until it has been signed by the licensee;

Date the license is issued;

Date the license expires;

Any other information required by the department to comply with applicable federal law;

At the option of the licensee pursuant to a signed application prepared by the department, a symbol that the designation of a person who could be contacted in the event of an emergency is on file with the department;

A veteran designation in the form of a printed “V” pursuant to W.S.

31-7-141

;

The space for a medical alert designation as provided for in W.S.

31-7-142

.

Licenses issued to persons under twenty-one (21) years of age shall bear distinctive markings indicating the licensee is under twenty-one (21) years. After January 1, 1994, a license shall expire no later than when the licensee attains twenty-one (21) years of age. The department shall notify the licensee at least ninety (90) days prior to his twenty-first birthday of the expiration date of his license. A licensee may apply for a license within ninety (90) days of attaining the age of twenty-one (21) years, payment of the proper fee and surrender of the original license.

Any permit issued in connection with a commercial learner’s permit shall be issued as a separate document or digital document, which shall comply with all security measures required by the department to comply with applicable federal law.

A license issued under subsection (a) of this section may include a digital driver’s license. A digital driver’s license may be issued upon request of a licensee and payment of the required fee. No digital driver’s license shall be issued unless the applicant holds the corresponding physical driver’s license or unless the corresponding physical driver’s license is issued simultaneously. The department may digitally cancel, suspend or revalidate a digital driver’s license on the occasions that a physical driver’s license would be taken possession of, cancelled, suspended, returned or reinstated, as appropriate. A digital driver’s license shall be designed:

To protect to the maximum extent practicable the digital driver’s license holder’s privacy, including the use of privacy enhancing technologies or other security methods as deemed appropriate by the department;

So that there is no need for the driver’s license holder to relinquish possession of the portable electronic device in which the digital driver’s license is stored to present the digital driver’s license.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 238, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 31-275.14; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 31-276.14; Laws 1977, ch. 114, § 2; 1978, ch. 41, § 1; 1985, ch. 40, § 1; ch. 234, § 2; 1988, ch. 44, § 1; 1989, ch. 176, § 2; 1993, ch. 145, § 2; 2000, ch. 83, § 1; 2009, ch. 35, § 1; 2011, ch. 168, § 1; 2013 ch. 71, § 1, effective January 1, 2014; 2013 ch. 199, § 2, effective July 1, 2013; 2019 ch. 139, § 2, effective January 1, 2020; 2020 ch. 15, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2009 amendment,

effective January 1, 2010, in (a)(iii)(C), substituted “principal residence address” for “mailing address” in the first sentence and added the third sentence; substituted “full facial digital color photograph” for “color photograph” in (a)(iiii)(D); and added (a)(iii)(J).

The 2012 amendment,

by Laws 2011, ch. 168, § 1, added (a)(iii)(K).

The 2013 amendments. —

The first
2013 amendment, by ch. 71, § 1, effective January 1, 2014, in (a)(ii) substituted “learner’s” for “driver’s instruction,” and added (c).

The second
2013 amendment, by ch. 199, § 2, effective July 1, 2013, added (a)(iii)(M).

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2019 amendment,

effective January 1, 2020, added (a)(iii)(N).

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (c), substituted “as” for “on” following “permit shall be issued” and added “or digital document” following “a separate document”; and added (d).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (a)(iii)(I) or (a)(iii)(L) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

State's liability to one injured by improperly licensed driver, 41 ALR4th 111.

§ 31-7-116.
Carrying and displaying.

Every licensee shall have his driver’s license in his immediate possession at all times when driving a motor vehicle and shall display the license upon demand of any judicial officer, municipal court judge, any officer or agent of the division or any police officer as defined in W.S. 31-5-102(a)(xxxiii). However, no person charged with violating this section shall be convicted if he produces in court a driver’s license previously issued to him and valid at the time of his arrest. For the purposes of this section “display” of a physical license means the surrender of the physical license to the demanding officer. After examination the officer shall immediately return the license to the licensee except as provided in W.S. 31-5-1205(k). For purposes of this section “display” of a digital driver’s license means that a licensee may provide access to the digital driver’s license on the licensee’s portable electronic device. No law enforcement or judicial officer demanding display of a licensee’s digital driver’s license for any licensing or identification verification purpose shall take custody of the licensee’s portable electronic device. Display of a digital driver’s license shall not serve as consent to search the driver’s portable electronic device. Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a person, other than the department if it has chosen to issue a digital driver’s license, to accept a digital driver’s license or otherwise require the purchase of equipment to verify the accuracy of a digital driver’s license.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 238, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 31-275.15; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 31-276.15; Laws 1985, ch. 234, § 2; 2000, ch. 48, § 2; 2020 ch. 15, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

Cross references. —

As to duty to exhibit license at scene of accident, see §

31-5-1103

.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in the third sentence, added “of a physical license” following “ ‘display’,” substituted “the physical” for “his” following “surrender of,” and added the last four sentences.

Authority to withhold license. —

Under the terms of § 31-5-102(a)(xxxiii), although a Bureau of Indian Affairs officer is not a Wyoming “police officer,” he may be considered a “peace officer” for the purposes of enforcing Tribal traffic law and is accordingly authorized under this section to withhold licenses. Pogue v. Allison, 851 F. Supp. 1536, 1994 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 6234 (D. Wyo. 1994).

No driver's license. —

District court did not err by denying defendant's motion to suppress marijuana that a state trooper found in the vehicle defendant had been driving because: (1) the incident began as a consensual encounter between the trooper and defendant, as the trooper stopped to render aid to defendant who was stuck in deep snow; (2) the trooper asked to see defendant's driver's license, which was wholly consistent with her duty as a police officer and did not invoke any constitutional protections; (3) the trooper subsequently determined that defendant had been driving without a license or insurance; (4) defendant consented to the trooper's search of the vehicle for insurance documentation; and (5) once the trooper entered the vehicle and smelled marijuana, she possessed the requisite probable cause to search the vehicle for contraband.
Shaw v. State, 2009 WY 18, 201 P.3d 1108,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 2009).

Cited

in

Meadows v. State, 2003 WY 37, 65 P.3d 33,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(Wyo. 2003).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity and construction of statute making it a criminal offense for the operator of a motor vehicle not to carry or display his operator's license or the vehicle registration certificate, 6 ALR3d 506.

Search and seizure: Lawfulness of demand for driver's license, vehicle registration, or proof of insurance pursuant to police stop to assist motorist, 19 ALR5th 884.

§ 31-7-117.
Restricted licenses.

Upon issuing a driver’s license the division for good cause may impose restrictions suitable to the licensee’s driving ability. The restrictions may require special mechanical control devices on any motor vehicle which the licensee may drive and any other restrictions upon the licensee the division determines to be necessary and reasonably likely to assure the safe driving of any motor vehicle by the licensee. The division may issue a restricted license to a person whose license has otherwise been suspended or revoked, as provided in article 4 of this chapter.

The division may issue a special restricted license or may state the restrictions on the license form.

The division may issue a restricted class “C” or “M” license, or both such licenses, to a person who is between the ages of fourteen (14) and sixteen (16) years upon receipt of application, payment of the proper fees, an affidavit of extreme inconvenience signed by the parent or guardian having custody of the applicant and a finding by the highway patrol that extreme inconvenience actually exists. The applicant shall successfully pass the examination required by W.S.

31-7-114

. The licensee may drive a vehicle only between the hours of 5:00 a.m. and 8:00 p.m., within a fifty (50) mile radius of his domicile and only at the direction of his parent or guardian. If any person while licensed under this subsection, receives a citation for a moving violation, the division, upon receipt of the notice of conviction, shall suspend the license and any other license or permit evidencing that person’s privilege to operate a motor vehicle. For purposes of this subsection “extreme inconvenience” includes the following circumstances:

The person must drive to school and the person’s residence is more than five (5) miles from the school;

The person has a regular job more than five (5) miles from the person’s residence;

The person must have the license to work in his parent’s business; or

Any other circumstance which the highway patrol finds is an extreme inconvenience.

Upon receiving satisfactory evidence of any violation of the restrictions of the license, the division may cancel, suspend or revoke the license but the licensee is entitled to a hearing under W.S.

31-7-105

.

It is a misdemeanor to drive a motor vehicle in violation of the restrictions imposed in a restricted license issued pursuant to this section.

A person who is at least fifteen (15) years of age who holds a restricted class “C” license may drive beyond the hours and radius specified in subsection (c) of this section if the person is accompanied by a person who:

Is at least eighteen (18) years of age;

Is licensed to drive as a driver for the type or class of vehicle being used;

Is fit and capable of exercising control over the vehicle; and

Is occupying a seat beside the driver.

Except as provided in subsection (f) of this section, any license issued pursuant to subsection (c) of this section shall only be used for the situation creating the extreme hardship and shall only be valid when accompanied by and used in conjunction with the statement restriction listing the circumstances of the extreme inconvenience. The statement of restrictions is to be issued by the department pursuant to the highway patrol’s investigation. Drivers convicted of violating this subsection shall be subject to the provisions of subsections (d) and (e) of this section.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 238, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 31-275.16; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 31-276.16; Laws 1985, ch. 234, § 2; 1989, ch. 206, § 1; 1999, ch. 52, § 1; 2005, ch. 197, § 1; 2006, ch. 82, § 2; 2009, ch. 192, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective September 16, 2005, substituted “Is licensed to drive as a driver for the type or class of vehicle being used” for “Has been licensed to drive for at least one (1) year” in (f)(ii).

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, added the last sentence in (a).

The 2009 amendment,

inserted “, or both such licenses,” in the first sentence of (c).

Laws 2009, ch. 192, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 12, 2009.

Applicability. —

Laws 2005, ch. 197, § 3, makes the act applicable to persons applying for a license or permit who are under the age of 17 on September 16, 2005, and who do not have a valid driver's license from Wyoming or another jurisdiction.

§ 31-7-118.
Replacement license.

If a license issued under this act is lost, destroyed or if the licensee desires to withdraw or insert notice of anatomical organ donation or a medical alert designation, the person may obtain the appropriate replacement license upon payment of the proper fee and surrender of the original license, if available.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 238, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 31-275.17; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 31-276.17; Laws 1977, ch. 114, § 2; 1985, ch. 234, § 2; 2019 ch. 139, § 2, effective January 1, 2020.

The 2019 amendment,

effective January 1, 2020, added “or a medical alert designation” following “organ donation.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see
§ 31-7-102(a)(xlix).

§ 31-7-119.
Expiration and renewal; required tests; extension.

Every driver’s license shall expire on the licensee’s birthday in the fifth year following the issuance of the license.

The division shall require every person applying for renewal of a driver’s license to demonstrate adequate visual acuity according to department rules. The division may require any applicant to take and successfully pass any additional tests or provide affidavits required or authorized under the original application as the division finds reasonably necessary to determine the applicant’s qualification according to the type or class of license. The written test for a hazardous materials endorsement shall be taken and passed if the person wants to retain an “H” endorsement unless the applicant’s written test results are less than two (2) years old.

Notwithstanding subsection (f) of this section, the division may defer for successive five (5) year periods the expiration of or renew the license of a licensee who is on active duty in the armed forces of the United States or of a licensee employed by a federal, state or local government agency, where the federal, state or local government agency requires the licensee’s physical presence in another state or foreign country, upon terms and conditions as the division may prescribe. The division may similarly defer the expiration of or renew the license of the spouse or dependent child of the person in the armed forces or the federal, state or local government agency if residing with that person.

Except as provided in article 4 of this chapter, any person whose license or privilege to drive a motor vehicle on the public highways has been revoked is not entitled to apply for a new license until the expiration of the period of revocation. Any person making false application for a new license before the expiration of the period of revocation is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or both.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, the driver’s license of any person who has not attained his twenty-first birthday may be renewed within thirty (30) days prior to the date of his twenty-first birthday upon application, payment of the required fee and satisfactory completion of the examination required or authorized by subsection (b) of this section.

Once in any ten (10) year period, a driver’s license may be extended for a five (5) year period without the examination required by subsection (b) of this section for a licensee:

Whose license has not been suspended or revoked in the five (5) years immediately preceding the date of license expiration;

Who, according to affidavits required by the division indicates no medical impairment which might represent a hazard to public safety;

Whose license is not restricted pursuant to W.S. 31-7-117(c);

Who does not have a material change in any personally identifiable information that requires the applicant to present one (1) of the documents listed in W.S. 31-7-111(a).

The division shall send a notification for license extension pursuant to subsection (f) of this section to the last known address of an eligible licensee, or notify by electronic means if the eligible licensee has consented to receive notices electronically, within one hundred twenty (120) days prior to license expiration. The license extension application shall be returned to the division with a postmark at least thirty (30) days before the license expiration date or, if the eligible licensee has consented to receive notices electronically, by electronic means at least thirty (30) days before the license expiration date. The application shall be accompanied by written evidence that the applicant has demonstrated adequate visual acuity according to department rules. Upon receipt of a completed application and the fee prescribed by W.S. 31-7-113(a)(v), the division shall issue a license extension to eligible licensees. The division shall provide a summary of changes in the law relating to motor vehicles to licensees who receive a license extension.

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 35, § 2.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 238, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 31-275.18; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 31-276.18; Laws 1977, ch. 114, § 2; 1978, ch. 41, § 1; 1979, ch. 11, § 1; 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 10, § 1; 1985, ch. 234, § 2; 1989, ch. 193, § 1; 1993, ch. 145, § 2; 1997, ch. 8, § 1; 2006, ch. 82, § 2; 2009, ch. 35, §§ 1, 2; 2019 ch. 172, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2020 ch. 15, § 1, effective July 1, 2020; 2021 ch. 38, § 1, effective July 1, 2021; 2022 ch. 72, § 1, effective September 1, 2022.

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, added the exception language at the beginning of (d).

The 2009 amendment,

effective January 1, 2010, deleted the last two sentences in (a) which provided for renewal of driver's license within 120 days; inserted “unless the applicant's written test results are less than two (2) years old” at the end of (b); added (f)(iv); and repealed former (h), which read: “The license extension shall be properly affixed to the reverse side of the license to validate extension.”

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (a), substituted “fifth year” for “fourth year”; in (c), substituted “successive five (5) year periods” for “successive four (4) year periods”; in the introductory language in (f), substituted “ten (10) year period” for “eight (8) year period,” and “five (5) year period” for “four (4) year period,” and in (f)(i), substituted “five (5) years” for “four (4) years.”

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (g), substituted “a notification” for “an application” at the beginning, added “, or notify by electronic means if the eligible licensee has consented to receive notices electronically,” following “an eligible licensee” in the first sentence, and substituted “before the license expiration date or, if the eligible licensee has consented to receive notices electronically, by electronic means at least thirty (30) days before” for “prior to” following “thirty (30) days” in the second sentence.

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, in (b), substituted “demonstrate adequate visual acuity according to department rules” for “take and successfully pass a test of his eyesight” in the first sentence, “the applicant's” for “his” in the second sentence; and substituted “applicant has demonstrated adequate visual acuity according to department rules” for “applicant's visual acuity is 20/40 or better with or without corrective lenses, as tested within one (1) year prior to submitting the application” in the third sentence of (g).

The 2022 amendment,

effective September 1, 2022, in (c), added “or renew” following “expiration of” twice, in the first sentence, added “for successive five (5) year periods” substituted “or of a licensee employed by a federal, state or local government agency, where the federal, state or local government agency requires the licensee's physical presence in another state or foreign country” for “for successive five (5) year periods” and “the division” for “its,” and added “or the federal, state or local government agency” in the second sentence.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2019, ch. 172, § 2, provides: “This act applies to licenses issued or renewed on or after July 1, 2019.”

§ 31-7-120.
Records to be kept by division; exceptions.

The division shall maintain a readily available file of and suitable indexes for:

All license applications denied with the reasons for denial noted thereon;

All applications granted;

Every licensee whose license has been suspended or revoked and the reasons for the action;

All accident reports and abstracts of court records of convictions received under the laws of this state with suitable notations for each licensee showing the convictions of the licensee and the traffic accidents in which he has been involved.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section the division shall twelve (12) months after conviction, expunge the record relating to the suspension of a driver’s license of a minor pursuant to W.S. 31-7-128(f) for the violation of any law or ordinance relating to the possession or consumption of a controlled substance or alcohol, except a violation of W.S.

31-5-233

. For any person whose records of a driver’s license suspension were expunged under this subsection, the suspension under this subsection is deemed not to have occurred and the individual may reply accordingly upon any inquiry in the matter. Notwithstanding W.S.

31-5-1214

, records of suspensions under W.S. 31-7-128(f) shall not be made available for public inspection except for inspection by any law enforcement officer or agency. Any driver’s license suspension or related records under this subsection shall not be the basis for any increase in insurance premiums or the cancellation of any insurance policy for a minor or his parents affected by this section.

The division is authorized to provide personally identifiable information in its records to the secretary of state for the implementation of the voter registration system. The provision of information shall be for the purpose of verifying voter registration data. The division shall do so in accordance with terms agreed upon by the secretary and the director of the department.

The division is authorized to provide personally identifiable information in its records to the commissioner of social security for the purpose of having the applicable information matched with the information in the commissioner’s records. The division shall do so in accordance with the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. 405(r), and the terms agreed upon by the commissioner of social security and the director of the department.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 238, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 31-275.19; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 31-276.19; Laws 1985, ch. 234, § 2; 1987, ch. 33, § 1; ch. 189, § 1; 1991, ch. 233, § 1; 2004, ch. 94, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to records and reports in traffic cases, see §§

31-5-1214

and

31-7-126

.

As to voter registration, see title 22, chapter 3.

The 2004 amendment

added (c) and (d).

Laws 2004, ch. 94, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2004.

Cited

in

Johnson v. State Hearing Exmrs. Office, 838 P.2d 158,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 1992).

§ 31-7-121.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 5, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1973, ch. 238, § 1, related to the authority of the department's medical advisory board on driver's license issues.

§ 31-7-122.
Reexaminations.

The division, having good cause to believe that a licensed driver is unsafe or otherwise not qualified to be licensed, may upon written notice of not less than ten (10) days to the licensee require him to submit to an appropriate examination. Upon the conclusion of the examination, or the refusal of the person to timely complete the examination, the division shall:

Cancel or refuse to renew the person’s license;

Permit him to retain the license; or

Issue him a license subject to restrictions as permitted under W.S.

31-7-117

or restrictions as to the type or class of vehicles that may be driven.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 238, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 31-275.27; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 31-276.27; W.S. 1977, §

31-7-128

; Laws 1985, ch. 234, § 2; 2005, ch. 79, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

in (a), in the second sentence, inserted “or the refusal of the person to timely complete the examination.”

Laws 2005, ch. 79, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 22, 2005.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 31-7-123.
Authority of division to cancel license or permit.

The division may cancel any driver’s license, instruction permit or commercial learner’s permit upon determining that the licensee or permittee was not entitled to the license or permit, that the licensee or permittee failed to give the required or correct information in his application, that the license or permit has been altered or upon receipt of a written statement from a licensed treating physician or optometrist stating that the licensee or permittee is not capable of safely operating a motor vehicle. The licensed treating physician or optometrist may request an examination by the division under W.S.

31-7-122

.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 238, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 31-275.21; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 31-276.21; W.S. 1977, §

31-7-122

; Laws 1985, ch. 234, § 2; 2005, ch. 79, § 1; 2013 ch. 71, § 1, effective January 1, 2014.

The 2005 amendment

added the provisions beginning with “or upon receipt of a written statement.”

Laws 2005, ch. 79, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 22, 2005.

The 2013 amendment,

effective January 1, 2014, added “or commercial learner’s permit” in the first sentence.

§ 31-7-124.
Suspension or revocation of privileges of nonresidents; reporting of convictions, suspensions and revocations by division.

The privilege of a nonresident to drive a motor vehicle on the highways of this state is subject to suspension or revocation by the division under this act.

The division, upon receiving a record of the conviction in this state of a nonresident driver of a motor vehicle of any offense, shall forward a certified copy of the record to the motor vehicle administrator of the state of the driver’s residence and to the state issuing the license.

When a nonresident’s operating privilege is suspended or revoked, the division shall forward a certified copy of the record of the action to the motor vehicle administrator of the state of the driver’s residence and to the state issuing the license.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 238, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 31-275.22; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 31-276.22; W.S. 1977, §

31-7-123

; Laws 1985, ch. 234, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsection (a), see
§ 31-7-102(a)(xlix).

§ 31-7-125.
Suspension or revocation upon notice of conviction in another state or in federal court.

The division shall suspend or revoke the license of any resident of this state or the privilege of a nonresident to drive a motor vehicle in this state upon receiving notice of the conviction of the person in another state or in a federal court of an offense which, if committed in this state, would be grounds for the suspension, revocation or disqualification of the license of a driver under W.S.

6-2-106

,

31-5-233

,

31-7-127

,

31-7-128

,

31-7-134

or

31-7-305

or upon receiving notice of a violation of a statute which, if committed in this state, would be grounds for suspension under the Motor Vehicle Safety-Responsibility Act. The division may suspend the license of any resident of the state or the privilege of a nonresident to drive a motor vehicle in this state upon receiving notice of the conviction of the person in another state or federal court of an offense which, if committed in this state, would be grounds for the suspension of the license of a driver under W.S.

31-7-129

.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 238, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 31-275.23; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 31-276.23; W.S. 1977, §

31-7-124

; Laws 1985, ch. 234, § 2; 2004, ch. 11, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, inserted “or disqualification” and “or

31-7-305

” in the first sentence.

Double jeopardy. —

Driver's license suspensions under §

31-6-102

do not constitute punishment for purposes of double jeopardy, but are civil proceedings, separate and distinct from prosecutions for driving while under the influence. Glasrud v. City of Laramie, 934 P.2d 1242,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 1997).

§ 31-7-126.
Reporting of convictions and failure to appear by courts.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, every court having jurisdiction under any statute of this state or a municipal ordinance adopted by local authority regulating the driving of motor vehicles, shall forward to the division within ten (10) working days from the date of conviction a record of the conviction of any person in the court for a violation of any of those laws or ordinances, other than those regulating standing or parking of a motor vehicle. The court shall also forward to the division a report of any violation by any person of a promise to appear in court as given to the arresting officer upon the issuance of a traffic citation and any failure to appear in court at the time specified by the court. Failure of a court to forward a record of conviction or violation under this section within the time specified in this section from the date of conviction or violation shall not affect the division’s authority under this act.

Upon implementation of a case management system in a circuit court or district court, the supreme court shall, on behalf of the circuit court or district court, furnish the abstract of the court record required under this section to the division. The abstract furnished under this section shall include the information required in W.S. 7-19-107(k).

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 238, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 31-275.24; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 31-276.24; W.S. 1977, §

31-7-125

; Laws 1984, ch. 41, § 4; 1985, ch. 234, § 2; 1987, ch. 33, § 2; 1990, ch. 92, § 1; 1991, ch. 233, § 1; 2005, ch. 197, § 1; 2011, ch. 167, § 1; 2020 ch. 4, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2005 amendment,

effective September 16, 2005, by deleting the former second sentence, requiring courts to forward to the division a record of the conviction of any person under 19 for a substance abuse or alcohol offense.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, deleted “written” preceding “promise” in the second sentence.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (a), added “Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section”; and added (b).

Applicability. —

Laws 2005, ch. 197, § 3, makes the act applicable to persons applying for a license or permit who are under the age of 17 on September 16, 2005, and who do not have a valid driver's license from Wyoming or another jurisdiction.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the last sentence, see
§ 31-7-102(a)(xlix).

License suspension of under-19 individuals unconstitutional. —

This section and § 31-7-128(f), which together provide for the driver's license suspension of individuals under 19 years of age convicted of possession or consumption of alcohol, represent constitutionally prohibited special legislation that lacks rational differentiation from persons aged 19 and 20 who are also denied the right to use alcoholic beverages constituting a similar class and, for that matter, those of any age whose excessive use makes their use illegal. (Decided prior to 2005 amendment). Johnson v. State Hearing Examiner's Office, 838 P.2d 158,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 1992).

This section and § 31-7-128(f), which together provide for the suspension of driver's license for individuals less than 19 years of age when convicted of possession or consumption of alcohol, constitute punishment for a previous conviction, in violation of the prohibition of double jeopardy under art. 1, § 11, Wyo. Const. (Decided prior to 2005 amendment). Johnson v. State Hearing Examiner's Office, 838 P.2d 158,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 1992).

§ 31-7-127.
Mandatory revocation of license for certain violations.

The division shall revoke the license or nonresident operating privilege of any person, upon receipt of a record of conviction of the person of any of the following violations:

Any felony which is the direct result of the manner in which a motor vehicle is driven;

A conviction under W.S.

31-5-233

or other law prohibiting driving while under the influence, if the person has been previously convicted two (2) or more times under W.S.

31-5-233

or other law prohibiting driving while under the influence within the ten (10) year period preceding:

The date of the offense upon which the conviction is based; or

The date of the conviction at issue.

A conviction under W.S.

31-5-229

, a similar local ordinance or a similar statute or ordinance in another jurisdiction, if the person has been previously convicted two (2) or more times under W.S.

31-5-229

, a similar local ordinance or a similar statute or ordinance in another jurisdiction within a five (5) year period preceding:

The date of the offense upon which the conviction is based; or

The date of the conviction at issue.

Failure to stop and render aid when involved in a motor vehicle accident resulting in personal injury or death, as required by W.S.

31-5-1101

, a similar local ordinance or a similar statute or ordinance in another jurisdiction;

Perjury or the making of a false affidavit or statement under oath to the division under any statute relating to the ownership or operation of motor vehicles;

Conviction under W.S. 31-7-133(a)(v);

Conviction under W.S.

6-2-106

or a similar statute in another jurisdiction.

The period of revocation for the violations in subsection (a) of this section is one (1) year except the period of revocation under paragraph (a)(ii) of this section is three (3) years.

Any person whose driver’s license or nonresident operating privilege has been revoked shall, for a three (3) year period beginning on the date of revocation, file and maintain proof of financial responsibility as required in W.S.

31-9-401

through

31-9-414

.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 238, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 31-275.25; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 31-276.25; W.S. 1977, §

31-7-126

; Laws 1979, ch. 139, § 3; 1984, ch. 41, § 3; 1985, ch. 234, § 2; 1987, ch. 39, § 1; 2010, ch. 5, § 1.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “ten (10) year” for “five (5) year” in the introductory language of (a)(ii).

Double jeopardy. —

Driver's license suspensions under §

31-6-102

do not constitute punishment for purposes of double jeopardy, but are civil proceedings, separate and distinct from prosecutions for driving while under the influence. Glasrud v. City of Laramie, 934 P.2d 1242,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 1997).

Tribal law as basis for revocation. —

A conviction for driving under the influence pursuant to Tribal law may support the revocation of a driver's license. Pogue v. Allison, 851 F. Supp. 1536, 1994 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 6234 (D. Wyo. 1994).

Foreign statute. —

Montana statute prohibiting driver from having alcohol concentration of 0.10 or more was a “law prohibiting driving while under the influence” for purposes of subdivision (a)(ii) of this section. Wylie v. Wyoming DOT, 970 P.2d 395,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 181

(Wyo. 1998).

License not revoked for municipal ordinance conviction. —

The legislature did not intend that a person's driver's license would be revoked under this section when he is convicted of failing to stop and render aid under a municipal ordinance, even though such a revocation is the result of a conviction under §

31-5-1101

.State ex rel. Department of Revenue & Taxation, Motor Vehicle Div. v. McNeese, 718 P.2d 38,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 531

(Wyo. 1986) (decided prior to 1987 amendments).

Authority of BIA agents to compel surrender of license. —

Under the Wyoming Statutes, Bureau of Indian Affairs agents have the authority to compel the surrender or suspension of a person's Wyoming driver's license. Pogue v. Allison, 851 F. Supp. 1536, 1994 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 6234 (D. Wyo. 1994).

Cited

in

Ayres v. State, 718 P.2d 905,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 548

(Wyo. 1986); Wyoming DOT v. Haglund, 982 P.2d 699,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 96

(Wyo. 1999).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “The New Implied Consent Amendments: A Step in the Right Direction,” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 165 (1986).

For case note, “Criminal Procedure — When Should a Jury Trial Be Required in the Wyoming Municipal Courts? City of Casper v. Cheatham, 739 P.2d 1222,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 471

(Wyo. 1987),” see XXV Land & Water L. Rev. 611 (1990).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Automobiles: validity and construction of legislation authorizing revocation or suspension of operator's license for “habitual,” “persistent” or “frequent” violations of traffic regulations, 48 ALR4th 367.

Validity, construction, application and effect of statute requiring conditions, in addition to expiration of time, for reinstatement of suspended or revoked driver's license 2 ALR5th 725.